ro-RO: Software > Software pentru jocuri video: Jocuri video digitale; Jocuri video fizice
sv: Programvara > Dataspel: Digitala videospel; Fysiska videospel
da: Software > Videospilsoftware: Digitale videospil; Fysiske computerspil
fi: Ohjelmisto > Videopeliohjelmisto: Digitaaliset videopelit; Fyysiset videopelit
zh-CN: 软件 > 电子游戏软件: 数字版电子游戏; 实体版电子游戏
fr: Logiciels > Jeux vidéo: Jeux vidéo numériques; Jeux vidéo physiques
el: Λογισμικό > Λογισμικό βιντεοπαιχνιδιών: Ψηφιακά βιντεοπαιχνίδια; Βιντεοπαιχνίδια σε φυσική μορφή
hu: Szoftver > Videojáték szoftver: Digitális videojátékok; Fizikai hordozón lévő videojátékok
pt-PT: Software > Software de videojogos: Jogos digitais; Jogos físicos
tr: Yazılım > Video Oyun Yazılımları: Dijital Video Oyunları; Fiziksel Video Oyunları
zh-TW: 軟體 > 電玩遊戲軟體: 數位電玩遊戲; 實體電玩遊戲
de: Software > PC- & Videospiele: Digitale Videospiele; Physische Videospiele
hr-HR: Softver > Softver za video igre: Digitalne videoigre; Fizičke videoigre
nb: Programvare > Videospillprogramvare: Digitale videospill; Fysiske videospill
pl: Oprogramowanie > Gry wideo: Cyfrowe gry wideo; Fizyczne gry wideo
it: Software > Software video game: Videogiochi digitali; Videogiochi su supporto fisico
ru: Программное обеспечение > Видеоигры: Цифровые видеоигры; Физические видеоигры
bg-BG: Софтуер > Софтуер за видео игри: Дигитални видеоигри; Физически видеоигри
cs: Software > Software pro videohry: Digitální videohry; Videohry
es: Software > Software de videojuegos: Videojuegos digitales; Videojuegos físicos
pt-BR: Software > Software de videogame: Videogames digitais; Videogames físicos
sl-SI: Programska oprema > Programska oprema za video igre: Digitalne video igre; Fizične video igre
ko: 소프트웨어 > 비디오 게임 소프트웨어: 디지털 비디오 게임; 패키지 비디오 게임
en: Software > Video Game Software: Digital Video Games; Physical Video Games
sk-SK: Softvér > Softvér pre videohry: Digitálne videohry; Fyzické videohry
lt-LT: Programinė įranga > Vaizdo žaidimų programinė įranga: Skaitmeniniai vaizdo žaidimai; Fiziniai vaizdo žaidimai
vi: Phần mềm > Phần mềm trò chơi điện tử: Trò chơi điện tử kỹ thuật số; Băng đĩa game
ja: ソフトウェア > テレビゲームソフト: デジタルビデオゲーム; パッケージ版ビデオゲーム
nl: Software > Videogamesoftware: Digitale computerspellen; Fysieke computerspellen
th: ซอฟต์แวร์ > ซอฟต์แวร์วิดีโอเกม: วิดีโอเกมดิจิทัล; วิดีโอเกมแบบแผ่น